California, session 20252026, AB1463.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35179.4 of the Education Code is amended to read:35179.4. (a) If a school district or charter school elects to offer any interscholastic athletic program, the governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school shall ensure that there is a written emergency action plan in place that describes the location of emergency medical equipment and procedures to be followed in the event of sudden cardiac arrest and other medical emergencies, including concussion and heat illness, related to the athletic program’s activities or events. By(b) By July 1, 2024, the emergency action plan shall include a description of the manner and frequency at which the procedures to be followed in the event of sudden cardiac arrest and other medical emergencies, including concussion and heat illness, which shall be based on the training described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 35179.1, will be rehearsed. The(c) The written emergency action plan shall be posted in compliance with the most recent pertinent guidelines of the National Federation of State High School Associations.